California statutes. Education Code
(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop guidelines for campuses of the University of California and the California State University to use in developing emergency evacuation plans for all forms of student housing owned, operated, and offered by the university, both on campus and off campus. In developing the guidelines, the Office of Emergency Services shall consider Sections 3.09 and 3.13 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations. The guidelines shall address all of the following issues:

(1) Plan content. The plans should include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(A) Specific evacuation
 routes that recognize the needs of persons with special needs, such as persons with disabilities.

(B) The designation of a meeting place or places upon evacuation.

(C) The education of students and staff in emergency procedures.

(2) The implementation and maintenance of the evacuation plan by the director of student housing, or other appropriate officer, at the individual campuses. The director, or other appropriate officer, is responsible for scheduling periodic tests of the plan and implementing changes as needed.

(b) Each campus of the University of California and the California State University shall establish an emergency evacuation plan for its
 postsecondary student housing and may consult with the Office of Emergency Services for guidance in developing and establishing the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 75.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.2. Student Housing Plans [66220. - 66220.]

66220.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that in order to close the degree gap by 2030, an estimated 251,000 additional degree completions at the University of California and 481,000 additional degree completions at the California State University will be required above the current projected degree completions.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2022, the Office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the Office of the President of the University of California is requested to, do both of the following:

(A) Conduct a needs assessment to determine the projected student housing needs, by campus, for the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal
 year, inclusive, taking into account the projected enrollment growth and the goal of closing the degree gap.

(B) Create a student housing plan, with a focus on affordable student housing, that outlines how they will meet the projected student housing needs, by campus, identified pursuant to subparagraph (A). The student housing plan shall include the specific actions to be taken for the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) Every three years after July 1, 2022, the Office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the Office of the President of the University of California is requested to, review and update the student housing plan described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), and include the specific actions to be taken in the next five fiscal years.

(c) For purposes
 of this section, “degree gap” means the gap between the number of highly educated workers that California’s future economy will need and the number the state is on pace to produce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.   (AB 1377)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.3. Veteran and California National Guard Supplemental Orientation Act of 2023 [66225. - 66226.]

66225.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Veteran and California National Guard Supplemental Orientation Act of 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   (AB 322)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66226.

(a) Commencing no later than the 2025–26 academic year, each campus of the California State University and the California Community Colleges
 shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, include within first-year student and transfer student orientations the location and contact information of the campus point of contact for students who are veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States and members of the California State Guard and the California National
 Guard, and their dependents.

(b) Commencing no later than the 2025–26 academic year, each campus point of contact described in subdivision (a) at the California State University and the California Community Colleges shall, and each campus point of contact described in subdivision (a) at the University of California is requested to, develop a document that includes, at a minimum, information on polices, resources, and services, including, but not limited to, counseling, for students described in subdivision (a) and their dependents.

(c) Commencing no later than the 2025–26 academic year, each campus of the California State University and the California
 Community Colleges shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, make the document described in subdivision (b) available in hard copy form at the location of the campus point of contact described in subdivision (a), and post the document, along with other information available to students described in subdivision (a) and their dependents, on the campus’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   (AB 322)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Equity in Higher Education Act [66250. - 66294.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title and Declaration of Purpose [66250. - 66252.]

66250.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Equity in Higher Education Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66251.

It is the policy of the State of California to afford all persons, regardless of disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any other basis that is contained in the prohibition of hate crimes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.6 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, equal rights and opportunities in the postsecondary educational institutions of the state. The purpose of this chapter is to prohibit acts that are contrary to that policy and to provide remedies for the commission of those prohibited acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 779, Sec. 1.   (SB 183)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66252.

(a) All students have the right to participate fully in the educational process, free from discrimination and harassment. Existing law, pursuant to Section 66270, provides that no person shall be subjected to discrimination on the basis of disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, or any other characteristic that is contained in the prohibition of hate crimes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.6 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, in any program or activity conducted by any postsecondary educational institution that receives, or
 benefits from, state financial assistance or enrolls students who receive state student financial aid.

(b) California’s postsecondary educational institutions have an affirmative obligation to combat discrimination on the basis of disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality or national identity, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, or any other characteristic that is contained in the prohibition of hate crimes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.6 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, and a responsibility to provide equal educational opportunity.

(c) Harassment directed at an individual on the basis of actual or perceived
 characteristics or status may create a hostile environment and jeopardizes equal educational opportunity as guaranteed by the California Constitution and the United States Constitution.

(d) There is an urgent need to prevent and respond to acts of discrimination on the basis of disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality or national identity, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, or any other characteristic that is contained in the prohibition of hate crimes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.6 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, that are occurring at an increasing rate in California’s postsecondary educational institutions.

(e) There is an
 urgent need to teach and inform students about their rights, as guaranteed by the federal and state constitutions, in order to increase students’ awareness and understanding of their rights and the rights of others, with the intention of promoting tolerance and sensitivity in postsecondary educational institutions and in society as a means of responding to potential harassment and violence caused by discrimination.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that each postsecondary educational institution undertake educational activities to counter discriminatory incidents on campus and, within constitutional bounds, to minimize and eliminate a hostile environment on campus that impairs the access of students to equal educational opportunity.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature
 that each postsecondary educational institution undertake supportive measures to help students who have encountered harassing or discriminatory incidents, regardless of the location of the harassing or discriminatory incident, to ensure students’ access to equal educational opportunities.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that each postsecondary educational institution address all forms of bias as part of their affirmative obligation to address discrimination on campus.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter shall be interpreted as consistent with Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 11135) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d, et seq.), Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the federal Equal Educational Opportunities Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1701, et seq.), the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51 of the Civil Code), and the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except where this chapter may grant more protections or impose additional obligations,
 and that the remedies provided in this chapter shall not be the exclusive remedies, but may be combined with remedies that may be provided by the above statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   (AB 2925)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [66260. - 66264.]

66260.

The definitions in this article shall govern the use of the terms defined for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66260.5.

“Disability” includes mental and physical disability as defined in Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66260.6.

“Disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic that is contained in the definition of hate crimes set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, including immigration status,” includes a perception that the person has any of those characteristics or that the person is associated with a person who has, or is perceived to have, any of those characteristics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   (SB 183)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66260.7.

“Gender” means sex, and includes a person’s gender identity and gender expression. “Gender expression” means a person’s gender-related appearance and behavior whether or not stereotypically associated with the person’s assigned sex at birth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 719, Sec. 10.   (AB 887)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66261.

“Governing board” means the governing board of a community college.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66261.3.

“Nationality” or “national identity” includes a person’s actual or perceived shared ancestry or ethnic characteristics, citizenship, or residency in a country with a dominant religion or distinct religious identity. Discrimination against Jewish, Muslim, Sikh, Hindu, Christian, or Buddhist students, or students of another religious group, when the discrimination involves racial, ethnic, or ancestral slurs or stereotypes, constitutes discrimination on the basis of nationality or national identity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (AB 2925)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66261.5.

“Postsecondary educational institution” means a public or private institution of vocational, professional, or postsecondary education; the governing board of a community college district; the Regents of the University of California; or the Trustees of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66261.7.

“Race or ethnicity” includes ancestry, color, ethnic group identification, and ethnic background.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66262.

“Religion” includes all aspects of religious belief, observance, and practice and includes agnosticism and atheism. “Discrimination on the basis of religion” includes, but is not limited to, anti-Semitism and Islamophobia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 844, Sec. 3.   (AB 2925)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66262.5.

(a) (1) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 212.5 and includes sexual battery, sexual violence, and sexual exploitation. 

(2) Sexual harassment of students is a form of sex discrimination prohibited by Section 66270.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings: 

(1) “Sexual violence” means physical sexual acts perpetrated against a person without the person’s affirmative consent, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 67386. Physical sexual acts include both of the following: 

(A) Rape, defined as penetration, no matter how slight, of the vagina or anus with any part or object, or oral copulation of a sex organ by another person, without the consent of the victim.

(B) Sexual battery, as defined in paragraph (2).

(2) “Sexual battery” means the intentional touching of another person’s intimate parts without consent, intentionally causing a person to touch the intimate parts of another without consent, or using a person’s own intimate part to intentionally touch another person’s body without consent.

(3) “Sexual exploitation” means a person taking sexual advantage of another person for the benefit of anyone other than that person without that person’s consent, including, but not limited to, any of the following acts: 

(A) The prostituting of another person.

(B) The trafficking of another person, defined as the inducement of a person to perform a commercial sex act, or labor or services, through force, fraud, or coercion.

(C) The recording of images, including video or photograph, or audio of another person’s sexual activity or intimate parts, without that person’s consent. 

(D) The distribution of images, including video or photograph, or audio of another person’s sexual activity or intimate parts, if the individual distributing the images or audio knows or should have known that the person depicted in the images or audio did not consent to the disclosure. 

(E) The viewing of another person’s sexual activity or intimate parts, in a place where that other person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy, without that person’s consent, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying sexual desire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 303, Sec. 2.   (SB 493)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

66262.7.

“Sexual orientation” means a person’s physical, emotional, and romantic attraction to other people. “Sexual orientation” includes, but is not limited to, heterosexuality, homosexuality, bisexuality, asexuality, and pansexuality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66263.

“State financial assistance” has the same meaning as defined in Section 213.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66264.

“State student financial aid” has the same meaning as defined in Section 214.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prohibition of Discrimination [66268. - 66271.1.]

66268.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California, pursuant to Section 66251, that all persons, regardless of their race, color, or national origin, should enjoy freedom from discrimination of any kind, including harassment based on a person’s actual or perceived shared ancestry or ethnic characteristics, or citizenship or residency in a country with a dominant religion, as described in Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d, et seq.), in the postsecondary educational institutions of the state.

(b) (1) The California Community Colleges, the California State University, independent institutions of higher education that receive
 state financial assistance, and private postsecondary educational institutions that receive state financial assistance shall, and the University of California is requested to, include training to address discrimination against the five most targeted groups in the state, as determined pursuant to paragraph (2), as part of any general antidiscrimination training or diversity, equity, and inclusion training that is offered by the institution, except any trainings targeted to solely address discrimination based on specific groups, including, but not limited to, age, disability, or sexual orientation.

(2) To determine the five most targeted groups in the state, postsecondary educational institutions shall refer to the subcategory bias motivations with the highest number of events, as provided in Table 1 of the annual “Hate Crime in California”
 publication by the Attorney General, which reports hate crime data required to be submitted to the Attorney General by law enforcement agencies pursuant to Section 13023 of the Penal Code.

(c) The training required pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be incorporated into the sexual violence and sexual harassment prevention training required pursuant to Section 67385.7.

(d) This section does not preclude the trainings required pursuant to subdivision (b) from incorporating discrimination against groups that are not listed in the five most targeted groups in the state. Trainings offered pursuant to subdivision (b) are encouraged to promptly address incidents of discrimination against one or more particular groups on the respective campus, especially groups that historically
 underreport incidents, even if they are not among the five most targeted groups in the state.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that all general antidiscrimination trainings and diversity, equity, and inclusion trainings address the complex and cumulative way in which the effects of multiple forms of discrimination combine, overlap, or intersect, especially in the experiences of marginalized individuals or groups.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 844, Sec. 4.   (AB 2925)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66270.

No person shall be subjected to discrimination on the basis of disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code or any other characteristic that is contained in the prohibition of hate crimes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.6 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, in any program or activity conducted by any postsecondary educational institution that receives, or benefits from, state financial assistance or enrolls students who receive state student financial aid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 779, Sec. 3.   (SB 183)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66270.3.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a postsecondary institution to offer admission or student financial aid to a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, as that paragraph exists on January 1, 2019. However, students granted status pursuant to subparagraphs (T) or (U) of paragraph (15), as specified, shall not be subjected to discrimination in admission or financial aid on the basis of immigration status. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change a student’s eligibility for state financial aid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 20.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

66270.7.

(a) As used in this section “hostile environment” means unwelcomed conduct based on a person’s actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, or disability status, that based on the totality of circumstances, is subjectively and objectively offensive, and is so severe or pervasive that it limits or denies a person’s ability to participate in or benefit from a campus’s education program or activity.

(b) The Trustees of the California State University and the Regents of the University of California have the primary responsibility to prevent and address conduct that either creates a hostile environment for students on campus, or results in differential treatment of students on campus based on a student’s actual or perceived race, color,
 ethnicity, national origin, religion, or disability status.

(c) The Trustees of the California State University shall do all of the following:

(1) Adopt rules and procedures in the student codes of conduct to provide all of the following elements:

(A) Prohibit violent, harassing, intimidating, or discriminatory conduct that creates a hostile environment on campus.

(B) Prohibit conduct that limits or denies a person’s ability to participate in or benefit from the free exchange of ideas or the educational mission of the California State University.

(C) Establish reasonable content-neutral time, place, and manner restrictions, and, if applicable, any advance permitting requirements for
 protests on campus.

(2) Adopt rules and procedures to take reasonable steps to respond to each incident described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) that creates a hostile environment on campus.

(3) Require each campus to publish on the campus’s internet website the time, place, and manner restrictions, and any advance permitting requirements for protests on campus.

(4) Develop mandatory training programs to educate students on all of the following:

(A) What constitutes violent, harassing, intimidating, or discriminatory conduct that creates a hostile environment on campus, and the procedures for investigating violations of the student code of conduct.

(B) When and where
 protests and gatherings may be held, including the difference between public fora, limited public fora, nonpublic fora, and private property, consistent with the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(C) How to exchange views in an atmosphere of mutual respect and civility.

(5) Require, as a condition of enrollment at a California State University campus, each student attending the campus to acknowledge the campus’s student code of conduct.

(d) The Trustees of the California State University and each California State University campus shall ensure that any policy adopted or enforced pursuant to this section, as applicable, is consistent with the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, Section 2 of Article I of the California
 Constitution, and Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d et seq.).

(e) (1) On or before January 2, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Trustees of the California State University shall submit a report to the Legislature on the implementation and administration of this section. This report shall include information on student code of conduct violations relating to incidents described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) The University of California is requested to comply with this section.

(g) This section is intended to be interpreted consistent
 with the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 62.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.

This chapter shall not apply to an educational institution that is controlled by a religious organization if the application would not be consistent with the religious tenets of that organization.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 66270.5 by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.1.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California may, adopt regulations as required by law to implement this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Sexual Orientation and Gender Identity Equity in Higher Education [66271.2. - 66271.41.]

66271.2.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University and the governing board of each community college district shall designate an employee at each of their respective campuses as a point of contact for the needs of lesbian, gay, bisexual, asexual, pansexual, transgender, gender-nonconforming, intersex, and two-spirit faculty, staff, and students at the respective campus. At a minimum, the name and contact information of that designated employee shall be published on the internet website for the respective campus, and shall be included in any printed and online campus directories.

(b) An employee designated as a campus point of contact pursuant to subdivision (a)
 shall not be considered a responsible employee for purposes of Section 66281.8. An employee designated as a campus point of contact pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not disclose confidential information provided to them by faculty, staff, or students about any alleged act of sexual harassment, sexual violence, or discrimination without the prior written consent of the person who provided the information to the designated employee.

(c) (1) Notice provided to an employee designated as a campus point of contact pursuant to subdivision (a), or a service provided by the designated employee, pursuant to this section regarding an alleged act of sexual harassment, sexual violence, or discrimination, shall not be construed as actual or constructive notice to the public postsecondary educational institution of that alleged
 act for purposes of investigations under Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.).

(2) Paragraph (1) shall only be construed in a manner that is consistent with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.).

(d) The University of California is requested to comply with this section. This section shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make it applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 490, Sec. 2.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.3.

The Legislative Analyst is encouraged to conduct an assessment of the California Community Colleges, California State University, and University of California systems with respect to the quality of life at those campuses for lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender faculty, staff, and students at the campuses of each of those institutions. If an assessment is performed, the Legislative Analyst is encouraged to use existing data provided pursuant to Section 66027 and other information available to the general public, and shall not be required to conduct new data collection or research specifically to contribute toward any assessment. The Legislative Analyst shall make recommendations to each of those institutions based on that assessment, and shall publish a summary of the
 recommendations developed pursuant to this section on its Internet Web site. The California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California are encouraged to share existing data or research, but are not required to conduct new data collection or research specifically to contribute toward any assessment managed by the Legislative Analyst pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 637, Sec. 5.   (AB 620)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, “public postsecondary educational institution” or “institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(b) (1) If a public postsecondary educational institution receives government-issued documentation, as described in subdivision (c), from a former student demonstrating that the former student’s legal name or gender has been changed, the institution shall update the former student’s records to include the updated legal name or gender. If requested by the former student, the institution shall reissue any documents conferred upon the former student with the former student’s updated legal name or gender. Documents that shall be
 reissued by the institution upon request include, but are not necessarily limited to, a diploma conferred by the institution.

(2) An institution shall not charge a higher fee for correcting, updating, or reissuing a document based on a legal name or gender change than the fee it charges for correcting, updating, or reissuing that document generally.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law in conflict with this paragraph, except Section 67400, an institution may use a student’s gender or legal name as indicated in a government-issued identification document only if it is necessary to meet a legally mandated obligation, but otherwise shall identify the student in accordance with the student’s gender identity
 and affirmed name.

(c) The documentation of a former student sufficient to demonstrate a legal name or gender change includes, but is not necessarily limited to, any of the following:

(1) State-issued driver’s license or identification card.

(2) Birth certificate.

(3) Passport.

(4) Social security card.

(5) Court order indicating a name change or a gender change, or both.

(d) This section does not require the institution to modify records that the former student has not requested for modification or reissuance.

(e) Commencing with the 2023–24 graduating class, an institution shall provide an option for a graduating student to request that the diploma to be conferred by the institution list the student’s chosen name. Commencing with the 2023–24 graduating class, an institution shall not require a graduating student to provide legal documentation sufficient to demonstrate a legal name or gender change in order to have the student’s chosen name be the sole name listed on the student’s diploma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   (AB 760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.41.

(a) The governing board of each community college district and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, implement a system by which current students, staff, and faculty can declare an affirmed name, gender, or both name and gender identification to be used in their records where legal names are not required by law.

(b) Upon the request of an individual, a community college campus and a California State University campus shall, and a University of California campus is requested to, update any records for current students, staff, and faculty to include the affirmed name, gender, or both name and gender
 identification. The records that shall be updated include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) School-issued email addresses.

(2) Campus identification cards.

(3) Class rosters.

(4) Unofficial and official transcripts.

(5) Diplomas, consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 66271.4, certificates of completion of courses, or similar records.

(c) (1) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, community college
 campus systems shall be fully capable of allowing current students, staff, or faculty to declare an affirmed name, gender, or both name and gender identification.

(2) Commencing with the 2024–25 academic year, California State University campus systems shall, and University of California campus systems are requested to, be fully capable of allowing current students, staff, or faculty to declare an affirmed name, gender, or both name and gender identification.

(d) A community college campus and a California State University campus shall not, and a University of California campus is requested to not, charge a higher fee for correcting, updating, or reissuing a document or record based on the declaration of an affirmed name or gender identification than the fee it charges for correcting,
 updating, or reissuing that document or record generally.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law in conflict with this subdivision, except Section 67400, a public postsecondary educational institution may use an individual’s gender or legal name as indicated in a government-issued identification document only if it is necessary to meet a legally mandated obligation, but otherwise shall identify the individual in accordance with the individual’s gender identity and affirmed name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 222, Sec. 2.   (AB 760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sex Equity in Education [66271.5. - 66284.]

66271.5.

The provisions of this article are supplemental to any provision in the Constitution or laws of the United States or laws of the State of California, relating to discrimination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.6.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) On June 23, 1972, Congress enacted Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 to the 1964 Civil Rights Act. This landmark legislation provides that: “No person in the United States shall, on the basis of sex, be excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination under any educational program or activity receiving Federal financial assistance.”

(b) While Title IX applies to all aspects of educational opportunities, it is well-known for opening the door to athletics for girls and women.

(c) In 1975, the United States Department of Health, Education and Welfare enacted regulations requiring that secondary and postsecondary schools comply with Title IX immediately. Those that could show real barriers to immediate compliance had just three years to meet the regulations, including equalizing their athletic programs.

(d) California state law has included several athletic equity provisions similar to those in Title IX since 1976. For example, the Sex Equity in Education Act provides, in subdivision (a) of Section 221.7, that: “It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities for participation in athletics be provided equally to male and female pupils.” Similar provisions are expressly applicable to community colleges and the California State University.

(e) Enhancing athletic opportunities for young women and girls is vitally important because of the significant benefits athletic opportunities provide including greater academic success, better physical and psychological health, responsible social behaviors, and enhanced interpersonal skills. For some women and girls, the financial support made available through athletic scholarships can make it possible to attend college.

(f) Title IX has promoted significant advances for women and girls to participate in sports. While fewer than 32,000 women participated in college sports nationally prior to the enactment of Title IX, today approximately 163,000 women participate—a nearly five fold—or more than 400 percent increase. Athletic opportunities for girls at the high school level nationally have grown even more dramatically—from 294,000 in 1972 to 2,800,000 today—an 894 percent increase. California boasts the second highest number of high school girls participating in athletics nationwide—a total of 270,000 girls in California’s high schools now participate in interscholastic athletics.

(g) Men’s intercollegiate athletic participation has also increased, rising from approximately 220,000 in 1981–82 to approximately 232,000 in 1998–99. Between 1981–82 and 1998–99, football participation increased by 7,199; men’s participation in baseball, lacrosse, and soccer also increased during the same time period. High school boys’ participation rates have also increased—jumping 8.2 percent in the last three years in California.
